Washington statutes.
RCW 41.08.075

Residency as condition of employment—Discrimination because of lack of residency—Prohibited.

No city, town, or municipality shall require any person applying for or holding an office, place, position, or employment under the provisions of this chapter or under any local charter or other regulations described in RCW 41.08.010 to reside within the limits of such municipal corporation as a condition of employment, or to discriminate in any manner against any such person because of his or her residence outside of the limits of such city, town, or municipality.

[ 2007 c 218 s 4; 1972 ex.s. c 37 s 4.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—2007 c 218: See note following RCW 41.08.020.

Purpose—1972 ex.s. c 37: See note following RCW 41.08.070.